Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Article 1. Licensing.
Sec. 21.27.150.
Limited licenses.

The director may issue a

travel insurance limited producer license to a person who is appointed under AS

21.27.100

and who sells travel insurance; in this paragraph, “travel insurance” has the meaning given in AS

21.27.152

;

title insurance limited producer license to a person whose place of business is located in this state and whose sole purpose is to be appointed by and act on behalf of a title insurer;

bail bond limited producer license to a person who is appointed by and acts on behalf of a surety insurer pertaining to bail bonds;

motor vehicle rental agency limited producer license to a person and, subject to the approval of the director, to employees of the person licensed that the licensee authorizes to transact the business of insurance on the licensee’s behalf if, as to an employee, the licensee complies with (D) of this paragraph and if the licensee

rents to others, without operators,

private passenger motor vehicles, including passenger vans, minivans, and sport utility vehicles; or

cargo motor vehicles, including cargo vans, pickup trucks, and trucks with a gross vehicle weight of less than 26,000 pounds that do not require the operator to possess a commercial driver’s license;

rents motor vehicles only to persons under rental agreements that do not exceed a term of 90 days;

transacts only the following kinds of insurance:

motor vehicle liability insurance with respect to liability arising out of the use of a vehicle rented from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement;

uninsured or underinsured motorist coverage, with minimum limits described in AS

21.96.020(c)

and (d) arising from the use of a vehicle rented from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement;

insurance against medical, hospital, surgical, and disability benefits to an injured person and funeral and death benefits to dependents, beneficiaries, or personal representatives of a deceased person if the insurance is issued as incidental coverage with or supplemental to liability insurance and arises out of the use of a vehicle rented from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement;

personal effects insurance, including loss of use, with respect to damage to or loss of personal property of a person renting the vehicle and other vehicle occupants while that property is being loaded into, transported by, or unloaded from a vehicle rented from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement;

towing and roadside assistance with respect to vehicles rented from the licensee during the term of the rental agreement; and

other insurance as may be authorized by regulation by the director;

notifies the director in writing, not later than 30 days after employment, of the name, date of birth, social security number, location of employment, and home address of an employee authorized by the licensee to transact insurance on the licensee’s behalf; and

provides other information as required by the director;

nonresident limited producer license to a person; a license that the director issues under this paragraph grants the same scope of authority as a limited lines producer license issued to the person by the person’s home state;

credit insurance limited producer license to a person who sells limited lines credit insurance;

miscellaneous limited producer license to a person who transacts insurance in this state that restricts the person’s authority to less than the total authority for a line of authority described in AS

21.27.115

(1) — (6);

portable electronics limited producer license to a vendor that sells or offers portable electronics insurance as defined in AS

21.36.515

; the following provisions apply to a license issued under this paragraph:

a vendor shall file with the director a sworn application for a license under this paragraph on a form prescribed and furnished by the director; the vendor shall provide the name, residence address, location of the vendor’s home office, and other information required by the director for an employee or officer that is designated by the vendor as the person responsible for the vendor’s compliance with the requirements of this chapter; however, if the vendor derives more than 50 percent of its revenue from the sale of portable electronics insurance, the vendor shall provide the information required under this subparagraph for all officers, directors, and shareholders of record having beneficial ownership of 10 percent or more of any class of securities registered under the federal securities law;

a portable electronics limited producer license issued under this paragraph must authorize the employees or authorized representatives of a vendor to transact portable electronics insurance at each location at which a vendor offers portable electronics to customers in this state; and

the employees or authorized representatives of the vendor may transact portable electronics insurance and are not required to obtain a limited producer license if

the employees or authorized representatives are not compensated based primarily on the number of customers enrolled for coverage; however, an employee or authorized representative may receive compensation for activities under the license that is incidental to the employee’s or authorized representative’s overall compensation;

the insurer issuing the portable electronics insurance provides a training program for employees and authorized representatives of the portable electronics limited producer licensee that includes instruction about the portable electronics insurance offered to customers and the disclosures required under AS

21.36.515

; and

the vendor maintains a register of each location in the state where the vendor offers portable electronics insurance and submits the register to the director not later than 30 days after the director requests the register;

crop insurance limited producer license to a person who sells or offers crop insurance coverage for damage to crops from unfavorable weather conditions, fire or lightning, flood, hail, insect infestation, disease, or other yield- reducing conditions or perils provided by the private insurance market or that is subsidized by the Federal Crop Insurance Corporation, including multi-peril crop insurance.

[Repealed, § 82 ch 81 SLA 2001.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 68 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 17 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 15 SLA 1999; am §§ 29, 82 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 21 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 9 ch 30 SLA 2009; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 25 SLA 2013; am § 19 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in (a)(4)(C)(ii) of this section, “AS

21.96.020(c)

and (d)” was substituted for “AS 21.89.020(c) and (d)” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS 21.89.020.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, effective August 21, 2013, in (a)(1), substituted “travel insurance; in this paragraph, ‘travel insurance’ has the meaning given in AS

21.27.152

” for “insurance connected with transportation provided by a common carrier, and limited to a specific trip, that covers (A) trip cancellation; (B) trip interruption; or (C) life, health, disability, or personal effects”.

The second 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, added (a)(8).

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a)(4)(D), substituted “not later than” for “within” and “after” for “of”; in (a)(8)(C)(iii), substituted “not later than” for “within”; added (a)(9) effective March 1, 2017; and made a minor stylistic change.

Sec. 21.27.152.
Travel insurance.

A person that makes, arranges, or offers travel services may transact travel insurance by offering, issuing for delivery, issuing, or renewing travel insurance to its customers on behalf of and under the direction of a person holding a travel insurance limited producer license under AS

21.27.150

.

A person may transact travel insurance under (a) of this section only if the person is included in the register maintained by the travel insurance limited producer under (e)(1) of this section.

A person transacting travel insurance under (a) of this section may not

evaluate or interpret the terms, benefits, and conditions of travel insurance;

evaluate or provide advice concerning a prospective purchaser’s existing insurance coverage; or

represent that the person is a licensed insurer, licensed producer, or insurance expert.

A person transacting travel insurance under (a) of this section shall provide to its prospective customers

a description of the terms of the insurance coverage;

a description of the claims process;

a description of the review and return or cancellation process;

the identity and contact information for the insurer and the travel insurance limited producer;

notice that a customer is not required to purchase travel insurance as a condition to purchasing other travel products or services; and

a statement that a person transacting travel insurance may provide general information about the insurance offered, including a description of the coverage and price, but is not qualified or authorized to answer questions about the terms and conditions of the insurance offered or to evaluate the adequacy of the customer’s insurance coverage.

A travel insurance limited producer licensed under this section shall

maintain, in a format prescribed by the director, a register of each person who transacts travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of the travel insurance limited producer and make the register available to the director on request; the register must include

the identity and contact information of the person transacting travel insurance;

the identity of a person who directs or controls the person who transacts travel insurance; and

the federal employment identification number of a person who directs or controls the person who transacts travel insurance;

certify that the person transacting travel insurance complies with 18 U.S.C. 1033; and

require a person transacting travel insurance satisfactorily to complete a training program that, at a minimum, contains instruction on the type of insurance offered, ethical practices, and the disclosures that must be provided to its prospective customers; the training program may be reviewed by the director.

A travel insurance limited producer is liable for the acts of a person transacting travel insurance on behalf of and under the direction of the producer. The travel insurance limited producer shall designate one of its employees as the person responsible for the travel insurance limited producer’s compliance with applicable travel insurance laws and regulations.

Travel insurance may be provided under an individual policy or under a group or master policy.

In this section, “travel insurance”

means insurance coverage for personal risks connected to travel, including

trip interruption or cancellation;

lost baggage or personal effects;

damage to accommodations or rental vehicles; or

sickness, accident, disability, or death occurring during travel;

does not include comprehensive medical insurance that provides coverage during trips lasting six months or longer.

History.

(§ 2 ch 17 SLA 2013)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 17, SLA 2013 which enacted this section, is effective August 21, 2013.

Sec. 21.27.160.
Scope of licenses.

An insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster is only required to have one license inclusive of all kinds or combination of kinds or all classes or combination of classes of insurance the insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster is licensed to handle.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 15, 16 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 69 ch 67 SLA 1992)

Sec. 21.27.170.
Insurance vending machines license. [Repealed, § 82 ch 81 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 21.27.180.
Scope of broker license. [Repealed, § 47 ch 51 SLA 1990.]

Sec. 21.27.190.
Bond.

In addition to any other requirements in this title, a bond required under this title or an alternative indemnity permitted under this section shall meet the following requirements:

it shall be continuous in form;

it shall remain in force until the licensee is released from liability by the director or until cancelled by the issuer;

without prejudice to any liability accrued before the effective cancellation, it may be cancelled if the director receives 60 days advance written notice;

the amount required to be maintained must be maintained unimpaired; and

it shall be in favor of insurers, insureds, and this state.

A bond may only be issued by an admitted insurer authorized to transact surety insurance in this state, or by a surplus lines insurer on the most recent list of eligible surplus lines insurers published by the director, that is acceptable to the director.

For a firm licensee, a single bond or an alternative indemnity permitted under this section may combine the sureties required

by separate sections of this title; and

for separate places of business.

[Repealed, § 83 ch 81 SLA 2001.]

Except as provided in this title, the director may adopt, by regulation, a deposit of cash, a certificate of deposit, or letter of credit as an alternative to a bond if the deposit of cash, certificate of deposit, or letter of credit meets the requirements of this section, other provisions of this title, and other requirements established by the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 14, 15 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 17 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 71 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 83 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Secs. 21.27.200,
21.27.210.
Broker’s authority and commissions; agent-broker combinations. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.215.
Employment contracts.

A firm may enter into an employment contract with a licensed individual to conduct business under the supervision of and in the name of the firm. The employment contract must be in writing and must specify the lines and classes of authorities of the individual and the firm. The individual and the firm shall retain a copy of the contract and shall reply in writing within three working days to an inquiry of the director regarding any business transacted by the individual and the firm.

The firm shall examine the credentials of the individual to determine that the individual is licensed to conduct the kinds of business described in the contract.

A licensed individual may, if authorized by the firm and an insurer for which the firm is an agent, issue on the firm’s behalf contracts of insurance in accordance with a written agency employment contract.

A firm shall be responsible for the actions of an individual transacting insurance under the firm’s employment contracts. In any disciplinary proceeding under this title, the existence of the employment contract shall be prima facie evidence that the firm knew of the activities of the individual.

The individual and the firm shall maintain a current list of all of their respective contracts that identifies, for each contract, the parties to the contract, the parties’ mailing addresses, electronic mailing addresses, and telephone numbers, and the parties’ license numbers, and the effective and termination dates of employment.

A licensee shall retain the records of an employment contract and make the records available for examination and inspection by the director, at any business time during the five years immediately following the date of the termination of the employment contract unless the director orders a longer period of retention. If the licensee assumes the business of another licensee or former licensee by merger, purchase, or otherwise, the requirements of AS

21.27.350(c)

apply.

History.

(§ 41 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Secs. 21.27.220,
21.27.230.
Solicitor’s qualifications; application for solicitor’s license. [Repealed, § 47 ch 51 SLA 1990.]

Secs. 21.27.240 — 21.27.260.
Fee for and custody of solicitor’s license; limitations; employer’s responsibility. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.270.
Licensing of nonresidents.

In accordance with P.L. 106-102 (Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act), the director shall issue a license to a nonresident license applicant on terms that are reciprocal with those of the applicant’s home state. Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this chapter, the director may by order waive any license application requirement in this chapter to achieve reciprocity to license a nonresident in accordance with P.L. 106-102 (Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act).

Unless the director denies or refuses to renew a license under AS

21.27.410

, the director shall issue a nonresident producer, limited lines, surplus lines broker, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, or reinsurance intermediary manager license to a person who is not a resident of this state if

the person is currently licensed and is in good standing in the person’s home state; the director may verify the person’s licensing status through the producer licensing database records maintained by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners or its affiliates or subsidiaries;

the person has paid the fees required under AS

21.06.250

and has submitted to the director

the license application the person submitted to the person’s home state; or

if the person is not a firm, a completed uniform application or, if a firm, the uniform business entity application; and

the person’s home state awards nonresident producer, limited lines, surplus lines, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, and reinsurance intermediary manager licenses to residents of this state on the same basis as does this state.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, the director may require a person applying for a

nonresident license to furnish the person’s fingerprints as required of a person applying for a license under AS

21.27.040(e)

;

surplus lines broker license under this section to have, and maintain while licensed in this state, the bond required of a person applying for a license under AS

21.27.790

(2); and

nonresident license to comply with the premium fiduciary account requirements of AS

21.27.360

and the regulations adopted under that statute.

A person licensed as a limited lines producer in the person’s home state shall receive a nonresident limited lines producer license granting the same scope of authority as the license issued by the producer’s home state.

In addition to the other requirements of this chapter, a person may not be licensed as a nonresident licensee until the person files a power of attorney as follows:

an applicant shall appoint the director as attorney to receive service of legal process issued against the licensee in this state upon a cause of action arising in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state; service upon the director as attorney shall constitute effective legal service upon the licensee; and

the appointment shall be irrevocable for as long as there could be a cause of action against the licensee arising out of an insurance transaction in this state or relative to a subject resident, located, or to be performed in this state.

Duplicate copies of legal process against a licensed or formerly licensed nonresident licensee shall be served upon the director either by a peace officer or through certified mail with return receipt requested. At the time of service, the plaintiff shall pay to the director a fee set under AS

21.06.250

.

Upon receiving a service of process, the director shall immediately send one of the copies of the process by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the licensed or formerly licensed nonresident licensee at the last address of record filed with the director.

A nonresident applicant for an independent adjuster license who only adjusts claims related to portable electronics insurance under AS

21.36.515

and who is licensed as an independent adjuster and in good standing in the applicant’s home state does not have to meet the requirements of AS

21.27.060

or

21.27.830

to be licensed under this section. A resident of Canada may not be licensed as an independent adjuster under this section unless the applicant has obtained a resident independent adjuster license in another state or declared another state the applicant’s home state and obtained an independent adjuster license in that state.

If a nonresident independent portable electronics adjuster applicant’s home state does not license independent adjusters, the independent portable electronics adjuster applicant may designate the applicant’s home state as any state in which the applicant is licensed in good standing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 22 ch 51 SLA 1990; am §§ 72 — 74 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 30 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 103 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For viatical settlements, see 3 AAC 31, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 26, 2014, added (h) and (i).

Sec. 21.27.275.
Alien licensees.

The director may issue a license authorized by this chapter to a nonresident of this state who does not have a home state if that person meets all the requirements of this chapter for that license applicable to a resident of this state applying for the same license.

History.

(§ 31 ch 81 SLA 2001)

Sec. 21.27.280.
Director as agent for service of process. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Secs. 21.27.290,
21.27.300.
Adjuster’s qualifications; contents of license. [Repealed, § 47 ch 51 SLA 1990.]

Secs. 21.27.310,
21.27.320.
Trainee adjusters; agent or general agent as adjuster; nonresident adjusters. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.330.
Place of business.

A person licensed under this chapter shall have and maintain at least one place of business that is physically accessible to the public in this state unless the person holds a nonresident license and principally conducts transactions in another state. However, the nonresident licensee must have at least one physically accessible place in the nonresident licensee’s home state. The requirements of this subsection do not apply to a nonresident independent portable electronics adjuster that has designated a state or territory other than the nonresident adjuster’s resident state as the nonresident adjuster’s home state or to a licensee who only conducts business in life or health insurance or annuities.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 1 FSSLA 2005.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 32 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 75 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 18 ch 56 SLA 1996; am § 32 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 23 ch 38 SLA 2002; am § 34 ch 1 FSSLA 2005; am § 3 ch 103 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 26, 2014, in (a), in the third sentence, inserted “a nonresident independent portable electronics adjuster that has designated a state or territory other than the nonresident adjuster’s resident state as the nonresident adjuster’s home state or to” preceding “a licensee who only conducts”.

Sec. 21.27.340.
Public display of license. [Repealed, § 94(a) ch 23 SLA 2011.]

Sec. 21.27.350.
Records of licensees.

A licensee shall document each action taken in regard to an insurance transaction. The documentation must contain all notes, work papers, documents, and similar material, and be in sufficient detail that relevant events, the dates of those events, and all persons participating in those events can be identified. The documentation must include a record of each insurance contract procured, issued, or countersigned, together with the names of the insurers and insureds, the amount of premium paid or to be paid, and a statement of the subject of the insurance; the names of other licensees from whom business is accepted, and of persons to whom commissions or allowances are promised or paid; and a record of each investigation or adjustment undertaken or consummated, and a statement of the fee, commission, or other compensation received or to be received on account of the investigation or adjustment.

A licensee shall keep at the licensee’s place of business or at the place of business of an admitted insurer a complete record of transactions under the license. An admitted insurer shall maintain records received from a licensee as required by this section.

The records of a particular transaction shall be retained and kept open for examination and inspection by the director at any business time during the five years immediately after the date of the completion of the transaction or 10 years for reinsurance transactions, unless the director orders a longer period of retention. If a licensee assumes the business of another licensee or former licensee by merger, purchase, or otherwise, the compliance officer of the assuming licensee firm shall provide to the director in writing each location where the assumed licensee’s records are maintained by the assuming licensee during the period in which the records must be kept available and open to the inspection of the director. A formerly licensed person shall provide to the director in writing each location where records shall be maintained during the period in which the records of a particular transaction must be kept available and open to the examination and inspection of the director. A formerly licensed person may, with the permission of the director, arrange to have a current licensee or the home office of the last known insurer of each policyholder maintain the records open to the examination and inspection of the director during the period in which the records must be maintained.

In addition to the record required under (a) of this section, a licensee shall have and maintain at the licensee’s principal place of business current accounting and financial records maintained under generally accepted accounting principles.

A licensee shall reply in writing within 10 working days to a records inquiry of the director. The director may inspect or request summary or detailed copies of records for examination by the division. Accounting and financial records inspected or examined under this section are confidential when in the possession of the division, but may be used by the director in a proceeding against the licensee. For purposes of this section, the records of a firm shall include and be considered the records of an individual licensee who has entered into an employment contract with the firm.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 20 ch 29 SLA 1987; am §§ 34, 35 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 77 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 33 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 42 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

For surplus lines — unauthorized insurers, see 3 AAC 25.

For suitability in annuity contract transactions, see 3 AAC 26, art. 6.

Sec. 21.27.360.
Reporting and accounting for premiums and premium taxes and fees.

A licensee involved in the procuring or issuance of an insurance contract shall report to the insurer the exact amount of consideration charged as a premium for the contract. The amount charged shall be shown in the contract and in the records of the licensee.

Except as provided under (h) of this section, all money, except that made payable to the insurer, representing premium taxes and fees, premiums, or return premiums received by the licensee shall be received by the licensee as a fiduciary and shall be promptly accounted for and paid to the person entitled to the money. Money held by the licensee as a fiduciary may not be commingled or otherwise combined with other money not held by the licensee as a fiduciary.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, a person who the director has determined has acted to divert or appropriate money held as a fiduciary for personal use shall be ordered to make restitution and shall be subject to suspension or revocation under AS

21.27.420

—

21.27.430

of all licenses and a civil penalty not to exceed $50,000 for each violation.

A licensee may only commingle premium taxes and fees, premiums, and return premiums with additional money for the purpose of advancing premiums, establishing reserves for the payment of return premiums, or reserves for receiving and transmitting premium or return premium money.

Money held by a licensee as a fiduciary may not be treated as a personal asset, as collateral for a personal or business loan, or as a personal asset or income on a financial statement, except that money held by the licensee as a fiduciary may be included in a financial statement of the licensee if clearly identified as assets held by the licensee as a fiduciary.

This section does not apply to an individual licensee who has entered into an employment contract with a firm and who acts solely on behalf of a firm that maintains compliance with this section.

[Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

A licensee who transacts the business of insurance under a motor vehicle rental agency limited producer license under AS

21.27.150(a)(4)

is not required to hold money collected from a person for the purchase of rental motor vehicle insurance coverage in a separate fiduciary account if

the fees for the rental insurance coverage are itemized and are a part of a rental motor vehicle transaction; and

the insurer has given written consent that the money need not be segregated from other money received by the licensee and the consent is signed by an officer of the insurer.

The director of insurance may adopt regulations to implement, define, and enforce this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 5, 6 ch 149 SLA 1984; am §§ 21, 22 ch 29 SLA 1987; am §§ 36, 37 ch 51 SLA 1990; am §§ 78 — 82, 223 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 42 ch 62 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 77 SLA 2001; am §§ 34 — 39 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 22 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 43 ch 23 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (i) was enacted as subsection (h) and relettered in 2001.

Cross references. —

For criminal provisions relating to misapplication of property by a fiduciary, see AS

11.46.620

.

Administrative Code. —

For fiduciary responsibilities of licensees, see 3 AAC 23, art. 4.

For bail bonds, see 3 AAC 23, art. 5.

Collateral references. —

Liability of insurance agent, for exposure of insurer to liability because of failure to fully disclose or assess risk or to report issuance of policy. 35 ALR3d 821.

Sec. 21.27.365.
Deposit or surety bond in place of fiduciary account. [Repealed, § 83 ch 81 SLA 2001.]

Sec. 21.27.370.
Sharing compensation.

Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this section, a licensee may not compensate a person, other than a licensee who is acting within the scope of the person’s license, for transacting insurance in this state or relative to a risk resident, located, or to be performed in this state.

Except as provided in (c) and (d) of this section, a person may not be promised or paid, directly or indirectly, compensation for transacting a kind or class of insurance for which the person is not then licensed to transact or for insurance that the person is prohibited by this title from transacting.

An unlicensed person who refers a customer or potential customer to a licensee and who does not discuss specific terms and conditions of a policy or give opinions or advice regarding insurance may be compensated for the referral, if the compensation

for each referral is

nominal;

on a one-time basis; and

fixed in amount by referral;

does not depend on whether the customer or potential customer purchases the insurance; and

is not contingent on the volume of insurance transacted.

An insurer or insurance producer may compensate an insurance agency or another person if that person does not transact the business of insurance in this state and the payment does not violate AS

21.36.100

or

21.36.120

.

A person who is no longer licensed in this state may be paid renewal or other deferred compensation for selling, soliciting, or negotiating insurance in this state if the person

was required to be licensed under this chapter at the time of the sale, solicitation, or negotiation; and

held that required license.

In addition to any other penalty provided by law, the director may suspend or revoke the license of a licensee participating in a violation of this section. The director may order a licensee who violates this section to pay a penalty of not more than three times the compensation promised or paid.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 84 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 22 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 40 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 24 ch 38 SLA 2002)

Sec. 21.27.380.
License renewal, expiration, and reinstatement.

Except as provided in this title, the director may renew a license biennially on a date set by the director if the licensee continues to be qualified under this chapter and, on or before the license expiration date, meets all renewal requirements established by regulation, submits a renewal application, and pays the renewal license fees set under AS

21.06.250

for each license authority to the director. A licensee is responsible for knowing the date that a license expires and for renewing a license before expiration. The director shall notify the licensee of the license renewal 30 days before the renewal date.

If a license is not renewed on or before the renewal date set by the director, the license expires. A licensee may not act as or represent to be an insurance producer, managing general agent, reinsurance intermediary broker, reinsurance intermediary manager, surplus lines broker, or independent adjuster during the time a license has expired. The director may reinstate an expired license if the person continues to qualify for the license and pays renewal license fees and a delayed renewal penalty. Reinstatement does not exempt a person from a penalty provided by law for transacting business while unlicensed. A license may not be renewed if it has expired for two years or longer.

If a licensee does not wish to renew a license issued under this chapter, the licensee shall surrender the license to the director on or before the close of business of the renewal date in the manner prescribed in AS

21.27.460

.

The director shall mail a notice of expiration stating the reason for the expiration to a licensee at the licensee’s last address on record with the director. The director shall obtain a certificate of mailing from the United States Postal Service.

A trainee license issued to an independent adjuster shall be for a term not to exceed 12 months and may not be renewed.

[Repealed, § 14 ch 6 SLA 2012.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am §§ 11, 12 ch 26 SLA 1985; am § 23 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 38 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 85 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 43 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 23 ch 96 SLA 2004; am § 10 ch 1 FSSLA 2005; am § 14 ch 6 SLA 2012; am §§ 20 — 22 ch 41 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

For fees, see 3 AAC 31, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective October 16, 2016, in (a), deleted “the close of business of” following “on or before”, substituted “license expiration” for “renewal”, inserted “, submits a renewal application” following “regulation”, inserted “authority” preceding “to the director”, substituted “expires” for “lapses”; in (b), substituted “expires” for “lapses” in four places and made minor stylistic changes; in (d), substituted “The director shall mail a notice” for “notice”, “expiration” for “lapse from the director” and “expiration” for “lapse shall be mailed”.

Sec. 21.27.390.
Temporary license.

The director may issue a temporary license only to a person who, except for experience, training, or the taking of an examination, meets all qualifications for a permanent license and if the person is

the surviving spouse, next of kin, or the administrator or executor of a deceased licensed insurance producer or managing general agent;

the spouse, next of kin, employee, or legal guardian of a licensed insurance producer or managing general agent who is disabled from transacting insurance because of sickness, mental illness, or injury;

a surviving member, officer, or employee of a firm licensed as insurance producer or managing general agent upon the death of the compliance officer of the firm holding the same licenses as the firm; or

the designee of a licensed insurance producer who enters active service in the armed forces of the United States, but only for insurance relating to insurers for whom the licensee was acting as an agent.

Except as otherwise provided by law, a temporary license may not be in effect for more than 90 consecutive days and may not be renewed or reissued for more than one additional 90-day period.

A temporary licensee may not be appointed by an insurer for which a licensed insurance producer or managing general agent was not appointed at the time of death or commencement of disability.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 23 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 13 ch 26 SLA 1985; am § 24 ch 29 SLA 1987; am § 39 ch 51 SLA 1990; am § 86 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 16 ch 54 SLA 1997; am § 23 ch 81 SLA 1997; am § 41 ch 81 SLA 2001; am § 34 ch 23 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing requirements, see 3 AAC 23, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, repealed (d).

Sec. 21.27.400.
Temporary license limitations. [Repealed, § 223 ch 67 SLA 1992.]

Sec. 21.27.405.
Hearing and order on violation.

On the complaint of a person or on the motion of the director, the director may conduct an investigation to determine whether a person has violated this chapter.

If the director determines that a person has violated this chapter, the director shall serve an order upon the person charged requiring that person to cease and desist from engaging in the act or practice. A person aggrieved by the cease and desist order may demand a hearing under AS

21.06.170

—

21.06.240

.

If the director believes that a person has violated a cease and desist order issued under (b) of this section, the director may certify the relevant facts to the superior court for proceedings under AS

44.62.590

. In addition to the penalties and remedies provided for in AS

44.62.590

, the superior court, upon finding that the cease and desist order has been violated, may order the violator to comply with the order, pay a penalty of not more than $100,000 for each violation, revoke or suspend the violator’s license, and bar the violator from transacting the business of insurance in the future.

History.

(§ 87 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 24 ch 81 SLA 1997)